Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.380

Transfer of county sheriff's employees—Conditions, limitations.

(1) An eligible employee under RCW 35.13.370 may transfer into the civil service system for the police department by filing a written request with the civil service commission of the affected city, code city, or town and by giving written notice thereof to the legislative authority of the county. Upon receipt of such request by the civil service commission the transfer shall be made. The employee so transferring will: (a) Be on probation for the same period as are new employees in the same classification of the police department; (b) be eligible for promotion after completion of the probationary period in compliance with existing civil service rules pertaining to lateral transfers based upon combined service time; (c) receive a salary at least equal to that of other new employees in the same classification of the police department; and (d) in all other matters, such as sick leave and vacation, have, within the civil service system, all the rights, benefits, and privileges that the employee would have been entitled to had he or she been a member of the police department from the beginning of his or her employment with the county. The county is responsible for compensating an employee for benefits accrued while employed with the sheriff's office unless a different agreement is reached between the county and the city, code city, or town. No accrued benefits are transferable to the recipient agency unless the recipient agency agrees to accept the accrued benefits. All benefits shall then accrue based on the combined seniority of each employee in the recipient agency. The county shall, upon receipt of such notice, transmit to the civil service commission a record of the employee's service with the county which shall be credited to the employee as a part of his or her period of employment in the police department. For purposes of layoffs by the city, code city, or town, only the time of service accrued with the city, code city, or town shall apply unless an agreement is reached between the collective bargaining representatives of the police department and sheriff's office employees and the police department and sheriff's office.

(2) Only as many of the transferring employees shall be placed upon the payroll of the police department as the city, code city, or town determines are needed to provide an adequate level of law enforcement service. The needed employees shall be taken in order of seniority and the remaining employees who transfer as provided in RCW 35.13.360 through 35.13.400 shall head the list of their respective class or job listing exclusive of rank in the civil service system in order of their seniority, so that they shall be the first to be employed in the police department as vacancies become available. Employees who are not immediately hired by the city, code city, or town shall be placed on a reemployment list for a period not to exceed thirty-six months unless a longer period is authorized by an agreement reached between the collective bargaining representatives of the police department and sheriff's office employees and the police department and sheriff's office. The county sheriff's office must rehire former employees who are placed on the city's reemployment list before it can hire anyone else to perform the same duties previously performed by these employees who were laid off.

(3) The thirty-six month period contained in subsection (2) of this section shall commence:

(a) On the effective date of the annexation in cases of annexation; and

(b) On the date when the city creates its own police department in cases of incorporation.

(4) The city, code city, or town shall retain the right to select the police chief regardless of seniority.

[ 1993 c 189 s 4.]